Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 2
WITNESSES FROM OUTSIDE THE STATE

Editor's note:

Prior to 1972, this part 2 was cited as "The Uniform Act to Secure the Attendance of Witnesses From Without a State in Criminal Proceedings". (See § 39-6-6, C.R.S. 1963.)

16-9-201. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"State" includes any territory of the United States and the District of Columbia.

"Summons" includes a subpoena, order, or other notice requiring the appearance of a witness.

"Witness" includes a person whose testimony is desired in any proceeding or investigation by a grand jury or in a criminal action, prosecution, or proceeding.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 235, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-9-204.

16-9-202. Summoning witness to testify in another state.

If a judge of a court of record in any state which by its laws has made provision for commanding persons within that state to attend and testify in this state certifies under the seal of the court that there is a criminal prosecution pending in such court or that a grand jury investigation has commenced or is about to commence, that a person being within this state is a material witness in such prosecution or grand jury investigation, and that his presence will be required for a specified number of days, upon presentation of the certificate to any judge of a court of record in the county in which such person is, the judge shall fix a time and place for a hearing, and shall make an order directing the witness to appear at a time and place certain for the hearing.

If at a hearing the judge determines that the witness is material and necessary, that it will not cause undue hardship to the witness to be compelled to attend and testify in the prosecution or a grand jury investigation in the other state, and that the laws of the state in which the prosecution is pending or grand jury investigation has commenced or is about to commence, and of any other state through which the witness may be required to pass by ordinary course of travel, will give to him protection from arrest and the service of civil and criminal process in connection with matters which arose before his entering into that state under the summons, he shall issue a summons, with a copy of the certificate attached, directing the witness to attend and testify in the court where the prosecution is pending or where a grand jury investigation has commenced or is about to commence at a time and place specified in the summons. In any such hearing, the certificate shall be prima facie evidence of all the facts stated therein.

If said certificate recommends that the witness be taken into immediate custody and delivered to an officer of the requesting state to assure his attendance in the requesting state, the judge may, in lieu of notification of the hearing, direct that the witness be forthwith brought before him for the hearing; and the judge at the hearing being satisfied of the desirability of such custody and delivery, for which determination the certificate shall be prima facie proof of such desirability, in lieu of issuing subpoena or summons, shall order that said witness be forthwith taken into custody and delivered to an officer of the requesting state.

If the witness, who is summoned as above provided, after being paid or tendered by some properly authorized person the sum of ten cents a mile for each mile by the ordinary traveled route to and from the court where the prosecution is pending and twenty dollars for each day that he is required to travel and attend as a witness, fails without good cause to attend and testify as directed in the summons, he shall be punished in the manner provided for the punishment of any witness who disobeys a summons issued from a court of record in this state.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 233, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-9-201.

16-9-203. Witness from another state.

If a person in any state which by its laws has made provision for commanding persons within its borders to attend and testify in criminal prosecutions or grand jury investigations commenced or about to commence in this state is a material witness in a prosecution pending in a court of record in this state or in a grand jury investigation which has commenced or is about to commence, a judge of such court may issue a certificate under the seal of the court stating these facts and specifying the number of days the witness will be required. The certificate may include a recommendation that the witness be taken into immediate custody and delivered to an officer of this state to assure his attendance in this state. This certificate shall be presented to a judge of a court of record in the county in which the witness is found.

If the witness is summoned to attend and testify in this state, or if the witness appears voluntarily at the request of the prosecution or the defense and the court would have otherwise approved a certificate for such witness pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, he shall be tendered the sum of ten cents a mile for each mile by the ordinary traveled route to and from the court where the prosecution is pending or, in the alternative and at the discretion of the court, an airplane ticket and twenty dollars for each day that he is required to travel and attend as a witness. A witness who has appeared in accordance with the provisions of the summons shall not be required to remain within this state a longer period of time than the period mentioned in the certificate, unless otherwise ordered by the court. If a witness, after coming into this state, fails without good cause to attend and testify as directed in the summons, he shall be punished in the manner provided for the punishment of any witness who disobeys a summons issued from a court of record in this state.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 234, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-9-202.

L. 87:

(2) amended, p. 604, § 4, effective July 1.

16-9-204. Exemption from arrest.

If a person comes into this state in obedience to a summons directing him to attend and testify in this state, he shall not while in this state pursuant to such summons be subject to arrest or the service of process, civil or criminal, in connection with matters which arose before his entrance into this state under the summons.

If a person passes through this state while going to another state in obedience to a summons to attend and testify in that state or while returning therefrom, while so passing through this state, he shall not be subject to arrest or the service of process, civil or criminal, in connection with matters which arose before his entrance into this state under the summons.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 235, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-9-203.

16-9-205. Production of tangible evidence.

The procedures set forth in this part 2 shall apply to both the compulsory attendance of witnesses and the production of tangible evidence by witnesses located in this state whose presence is required in an action in another state and to witnesses from another state whose presence is required in an action in this state.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire section added, p. 927, § 4, effective July 1.